Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5640XS (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2136 Section 1. Section 595.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Where the parties have not submitted 3 documentation with the application for a marriage license 4 demonstrating the parties attended one hour of premarriage 5 legal counseling provided by an attorney. The judicial branch, 6 in consultation with a private legal organization representing 7 lawyers in this state, shall prescribe the required content of 8 the premarriage legal counseling, including but not limited to 9 basic legal information about common marriage, dissolution of 10 marriage, and child custody issues. 11